Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-225
State flood mitigation plan; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that the State of Nebraska experienced a historic flood event in 2019. This flood event significantly impacted numerous communities and individual Nebraskans. Coordination and communication between state and local entities implementing flood mitigation strategies is essential to maximize federal funds for flood mitigation efforts.

Laws 2020, LB632, § 9.